Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1074XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 34 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 6, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) All In addition to the physical education curriculum 3 required under subsection 3, physically able students in 4 kindergarten through grade five who are not suspended or 5 expelled shall be required to engage in a physical activity 6 for a minimum of thirty consecutive minutes per school day. A 7 school shall not prevent a student from engaging in a physical 8 activity as required in this subparagraph unless one of the 9 following applies: 10 (a) The student poses a danger to the health or safety of a 11 school employee, contractor, or another student. 12 (b) Due to inclement weather, the school relocates physical 13 activity that was to take place outdoors. 14 (c) The school dismisses classes early due to unforeseen 15 circumstances, including inclement weather or loss of utilities 16 services. 17 (d) The student is absent from school, including due to 18 illness or a medical appointment, during the time of the school 19 day that the school provides for the studentâs class to engage 20 in physical activity. 21